District of Columbia statutes.
24-930

Graduation.

Upon completion of the BOOT CAMP, a graduation ceremony may be held, at which time earned GED’s may be awarded, as well as other appropriate recognition.

Jan. 27, 1994, D.C. Law 10-67, § 501, 40 DCR 5768
1981 Ed., § 24-830.